Hawaii statutes.
[§457-2.5] Registered
nurse. Practice as a registered nurse means the full scope of
nursing, regardless of compensation or personal profit, that incorporates
caring for all clients in all settings and is guided by the scope of practice
authorized by this chapter, the rules of the board, and nursing standards
established or recognized by the board including but not limited to:

(1) The National Council of State Boards of Nursing
Model Nursing Practice Act, Article II, Scope of Nursing Practice, section 2;
and

(2) The National Council of State Boards of Nursing
Model Nursing Administrative Rules, Chapter Two, Standards of Nursing Practice,
sections 2.2.2 through 2.2.6;

provided that NCSBN shall have no legal authority
over the board and shall have no legal authority or powers of oversight of the
board in the exercise of its powers and duties authorized by law. [L 2010, c
57, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next